Hawaii statutes.
[§451A-19] Penalties. Any person who
violates this chapter shall be fined not more than $500 or imprisoned not more
than ninety days, or both. [L 1969, c 205, pt of §1]

Cross References

Classification of offense and authorized punishment, see
§§701-107, 706-640, and 706-663.

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next